Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.035

Organization of school districts.

A school district shall be organized in form and manner as hereinafter in this chapter provided, and shall be known as . . . . . . (insert here the name of the district) School District No. . . . ., . . . . . . county, state of Washington: PROVIDED, That all school districts now existing as shown by the records of the educational service district superintendent are hereby recognized as legally organized districts: PROVIDED FURTHER, That all school districts existing on April 25, 1969 as shown by the records of the county or intermediate district superintendents are hereby recognized as legally organized districts.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 88; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 124; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.130. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-22. Formerly RCW 28A.315.220, 28A.57.130, 28.57.130.]

NOTES:

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.